Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2366.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sgt. Allan R. Bevington Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Allan R. Bevington was born December 25, 1983, in Beaver Falls.(2) Sgt. Bevington graduated from Beaver Falls High School in 2002, where he played baseball and football.(3) While still in high school, Sgt. Bevington enlisted in the United States Army as a combat engineer.(4) Outside of work, Sgt. Bevington loved spending time hunting and fishing, and during his first leave from the Army, Sgt. Bevington purchased a 2002 Ford Mustang GT, which was his dream car.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Sgt. Bevington displayed great dedication and skill within his first and only unit, Bravo Company 40th Engineers 1st Armored Division, stationed in Baumholder, Germany.(6) While deployed on his first tour in Iraq, Sgt. Bevington was quickly promoted to the rank of Sergeant as a result of his leadership.(7) Sgt. Bevington was awarded the Purple Heart and Bronze Star for defending his unit on his first deployment and was awarded the Silver Star on his last deployment.(8) Sgt. Bevington was sent to special training as a Sapper, earning the title as an elite combat engineer.(9) During Sgt. Bevington's last tour, his unit was preparing to return to Germany in one week.(10) In preparation for convoy, Sgt. Bevington's squad was sent on a pre-route inspection, during which they found an IED.(11) On September 21, 2006, while preparing to disarm the IED, the IED went off, killing Sgt. Bevington instantly and wounding another soldier.(12) Sgt. Bevington is survived by his mother, Beverly Bevington, father, Frank Law, brothers, Charles (Chuck) and Robert (Bob) Bevington, nieces, Sarah Smiley, Chealsey Bevington and nephew, Brock Bevington.(b) Designation.--The portion of Pennsylvania Route 18 from the intersection with 37th Street to the intersection with Wallace Run Road in Beaver Falls, Beaver County, is designated the Sgt. Allan R. Bevington Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.20260HB2366PN3147 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2366PN3147 - 3 - 12